Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2315
Cost of testing.

When testing of domesticated cervine animals is performed pursuant to an order by the department, the owners of such animals are responsible for the cost of gathering, confining, restraining, and testing such animals and for providing the necessary facilities and assistance.

Laws 1999, LB 404, § 14.